Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 6. Zoning

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

83 Am. Jur. 2d Zoning and Planning § 1 et seq.

Zoning: what constitutes “incidental” or “accessory” use of property zoned, and primarily used, for business or commercial purposes, 60 ALR4th 907.

Construction and effect of statute requiring that zoning application be treated as approved if not acted on within specified period of time, 66 ALR4th 1012.

101A C.J.S. Zoning and Land Planning § 1 et seq.

§ 15-1-601.
Regulations; scope and purpose; uniformity within authorized districts; to follow plan; objectives.

The governing body of any city or town, by ordinance, may:

Regulate and restrict the:

Height, number of stories and size of buildings and other structures;

Percentage of lot that may be occupied;

Size of yards, courts and other open spaces;

Density of population; and

Location and use of buildings, structures and land for trade, industry, residence or other purposes.

Establish setback building lines.

The governing body may divide the city or town into districts of such number, shape and area as it deems necessary, and within those districts it may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures or land.

Regulations may differ from one (1) district to another but shall be uniform for each class or kind of buildings within a district.

All regulations shall be made:

In accordance with a comprehensive plan and designed to:

Lessen congestion in the streets;

Secure safety from fire, panic and other dangers;

Promote health and general welfare;

Provide adequate light and air;

Prevent the overcrowding of land;

Avoid undue concentration of population; and

Facilitate adequate provisions for transportation, water, sewerage, schools, parks and other public requirements.

With reasonable consideration, among other things, of the character of the district and its peculiar suitability for particular uses;

With a view to conserving the value of buildings and encouraging the most appropriate use of land throughout the city or town; and

With consideration given to the historic integrity of certain neighborhoods or districts and a view to preserving, rehabilitating and maintaining historic properties and encouraging compatible uses within the neighborhoods or districts, but no regulation made to carry out the purposes of this paragraph is valid to the extent it constitutes an unconstitutional taking without compensation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 83, 84, 85; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-83 to 15.1-85; W.S. 1977, §§

15-1-701

to

15-1-703

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 6, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to planning in cities and towns, see §§

15-1-501

to

15-1-512

.

As to eminent domain, see art. 1, §§ 32 and 33, Wyo. Const.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1 W.R.C.P.

As to municipal airports and zoning regulations, see §§

10-5-301

,

10-5-302

.

As to county planning and zoning generally, see §§

18-5-101

to

18-5-208

.

As to platting and dedication generally, see §§

34-12-101

to

34-12-115

.

The 2006 amendment,

in (d), added “and” at the end of (iii); and made a related change in (ii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Municipalities have full authority and control over public water and sewerage systems.

Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Park-land dedication ordinances. —

The broad powers delegated by the legislature can fairly encompass the power to adopt a park-land dedication ordinance. A city can require the payment of a sum in lieu of park-land dedication in order to lessen the impact and pressure on park facilities that results from the influx of inhabitants caused by a new development. The limitation on this power is the requirement that any fees collected in lieu of land dedication must be earmarked to accounts for the purpose of acquiring needed park land and maintenance of existing park facilities. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Use restrictions must be justified under some aspect of police power

exerted for the public welfare. Unless the particular regulation bears a substantial relation to the public health, safety, morals, comfort, convenience or the general good and welfare in the proper sense, it is an invasion of the constitutional right of private property. The inquiry in such case is whether the restraint thus put upon property passes the bounds of reason and assumes the character of a merely arbitrary fiat. State ex rel. George v. Hull, 65 Wyo. 251, 199 P.2d 832,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1948).

Statutory authority permitting zoning in incorporated cities and towns of state is the police power of the state thus delegated, but such authority, relative to a residence district, which is to preserve rather than to disrupt existing conditions, must be reasonably exercised, which was not done when it deprived plaintiff of beneficial use of his property, amid surrounding business properties, of which defendant city had sufficient notice; hence enforcement of ordinance zoning for residence purposes only would be enjoined. Weber v. Cheyenne, 55 Wyo. 202, 97 P.2d 667,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1940).

Non-conforming use. —

Only reasonable interpretation of a town's zoning ordinances was that all the choices under a parking option remained available to a brewery as non-conforming use; it would have violated paragraph (d)(iv) to declare that the parking options were no longer available to the brewery, as such a result would have rendered valueless the brewery's substantial business investment. Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002).

Standing to restrain enforcement of zoning ordinance. —

One who had paid $500.00 on contract for purchase of lots was present owner of a substantial interest and of a right sought to be enforced, and, as such, was “a real party in interest,” as plaintiff, in action to restrain enforcement of city ordinance zoning same for residence purposes, even though he had orally agreed with third party for their sale for filling station purposes, conditional upon plaintiff's obtaining proper zoning authority. Weber v. Cheyenne, 55 Wyo. 202, 97 P.2d 667,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1940).

Town’s authority to enact zoning ordinance. —

Landowner's claim that a town did not have the authority to adopt
an ordinance that banned the installation of any manufactured home
older than 10 years at the time of the relevant permit application
failed because the town had authority to enact the ordinance since
the ordinance did not conflict with this section, which listed various
zoning measures that were within a municipality's power to enact.
Schanzenbach v. Town of La Barge, 706 F.3d 1277, 2013 U.S. App. LEXIS 2672 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2013).

Quoted

in

Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Aesthetic as a Factor Considered in Zoning,” see 15 Wyo. L.J. 77 (1960).

For comment, “County and Municipal Flood Plain Zoning Under Existing Wyoming Legislation,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 103 (1972).

As to the development of land use planning in Wyoming, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 73 (1977).

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Garage as part of house with which it is physically connected within zoning regulations, 7 ALR2d 593.

Constitutionality of zoning based on size of commercial or industrial enterprises or units, 7 ALR2d 1007.

Validity of building height regulations, 8 ALR2d 963.

Exclusion from municipality of industrial activity that is inconsistent with residential character, 9 ALR2d 683.

Zoning regulations in respect of intoxicating liquor,
9 ALR2d 877.,
65 ALR4th 555.

Change in ownership of nonconforming business or use as affecting right to continuance thereof, 9 ALR2d 1039.

Zoning regulations applicable to tourist or trailer camps, motor courts or motels, 22 ALR2d 774.

Zoning regulations as to privately owned parking places, 29 ALR2d 856.

Injuries or death, violation of zoning ordinance or regulation as affecting or creating liability for, 31 ALR2d 1469.

Validity of zoning regulation prohibiting residential use of industrial district, 38 ALR2d 1141.

Validity of zoning regulations with respect to uncertainty and indefiniteness of district boundary lines, 39 ALR2d 766.

Nurseries and greenhouses, permissible activities under zoning laws permitting, 40 ALR2d 1459.

Territory annexed to a municipality, what zoning regulations are applicable to, 41 ALR2d 1463.

Exclusionary zoning, 48 ALR3d 1210.

Cemetery, validity of public prohibition or regulation of location of, 50 ALR2d 905.

Spot zoning to permit neighborhood shopping centers, 51 ALR2d 263.

What is a “club” or “clubhouse” within provisions of zoning regulations, 52 ALR2d 1098.

Zoning regulations as to business of selling motor vehicles, 57 ALR2d 1265.

Attack on validity of zoning statute on ground of improper delegation of authority to board or officer, 58 ALR2d 1083.

Applicability of zoning regulations to governmental projects or activities, 61 ALR2d 970.

Applicability of zoning regulations as to governmental hospitals, 61 ALR2d 970.

Access to industrial, commercial, or business premises over premises differently zoned, 63 ALR2d 1446.

Lodging house or boardinghouse within provision of zoning ordinance or regulation, 64 ALR2d 1167.

Accountants, zoning regulations as to, 70 ALR2d 433.

“Home occupation” or the like within accessory use provision of zoning regulation, 73 ALR2d 439.

Refusal of use of residentially zoned land for business access by abutter to street or highway, 73 ALR2d 652.

Validity and construction of zoning regulation requiring garage or parking space, 74 ALR2d 418.

Gasoline filling stations, zoning regulations as to, 75 ALR2d 168.

Shopping centers, zoning regulations as to, 76 ALR2d 1172.

Effect of provision in real-estate option or land sale contract making the contract subject to zoning or rezoning of the property, 76 ALR2d 1195.

Airport, validity of zoning ordinance limiting use of land near or surrounding, 77 ALR2d 1355.

Restaurants, diners, “drive-ins,” or the like, zoning regulations as forbidding or restricting, 82 ALR2d 989.

“Racing” or “race track” within zoning regulation forbidding such activity, 83 ALR2d 877.

Dancing schools, zoning regulations as applied to, 85 ALR2d 1150.

Zoning regulation of self-service laundries, 87 ALR2d 1007.

Construction and effect of clause making lease contingent or conditional upon the lessee obtaining a use permit from public building or zoning authorities, 90 ALR2d 1031.

Zoning regulations relating to private residential swimming pools, 92 ALR2d 1283.

Validity of front setback provision in zoning ordinance or regulation, 93 ALR2d 1223.

Construction of front setback provisions in zoning ordinance or regulation, 93 ALR2d 1244.

Construction of zoning regulations requiring side or rear yards, 94 ALR2d 419.

Validity of zoning regulations prescribing minimum area for house lots or requiring area proportionate to number of families to be housed, 95 ALR2d 716.

Construction of zoning regulations prescribing minimum area for house lots or requiring an area proportionate to number of families to be housed, 95 ALR2d 761.

Use of trailer or similar structure for residence purposes as within zoning provision, 96 ALR2d 232, 17 ALR4th 106.

Width or frontage for residence lots, 96 ALR2d 1367.

Maximum percentage of residential lot area which may be occupied by buildings, 96 ALR2d 1396.

Research and laboratory facilities, application of zoning requirements to, 98 ALR2d 225.

Validity, construction, and effect of zoning regulations as regards “garden-type apartments” and “row housing,” 99 ALR2d 873.

Construction of provisions precluding sale of intoxicating liquors within specified distance from another establishment selling such liquors, 7 ALR3d 809.

Construction and application of zoning regulations in connection with bomb or fallout shelters, 7 ALR3d 1443.

Zoning as a factor in determination of damages in eminent domain, 9 ALR3d 291.

Prohibiting or regulating removal or exploitation of oil and gas, minerals, soil, or other natural products within municipal limits, 10 ALR3d 1226.

Application of zoning regulations to automatic vending machines, 11 ALR3d 1004.

Meaning of term “garage” as used in zoning regulation, 11 ALR3d 1187.

Purchaser of real property as precluded from attacking validity of zoning regulation existing at the time of the purchase and affecting the purchased property, 17 ALR3d 743.

Aesthetic objectives or considerations as affecting validity of zoning ordinance, 21 ALR3d 1222.

Validity of provisions or amortization of nonconforming uses, 22 ALR3d 1134.

Application of zoning regulations to motels or motor courts, 23 ALR3d 1210.

Construction and effect of zoning provision permitting accessory use for “professional office,” 24 ALR3d 1128.

Application of zoning regulations to college fraternities or sororities, 25 ALR3d 921.

Validity and construction of zoning regulations expressly referring to hospitals, sanitariums, nursing homes, 27 ALR3d 1022.

Meaning of the term “hotel” as used in zoning ordinances, 28 ALR3d 1240.

Validity and effect of “interim” zoning ordinance, 30 ALR3d 1196.

Application of zoning regulations to golf courses, swimming pools, tennis courts, or the like, 32 ALR3d 424.

Rights between landlord and tenant as affected by zoning regulations restricting contemplated use of premises, 37 ALR3d 1018.

Zoning or other public restrictions on the use of property as affecting rights and remedies of parties to contract for the sale thereof, 39 ALR3d 362.

Requirement that zoning variances or exceptions be made in accordance with comprehensive plan, 40 ALR3d 372.

Validity and construction of “zoning with compensation” regulation, 41 ALR3d 636.

Validity and construction of zoning ordinance regulating architectural style or design of structure, 41 ALR3d 1397.

Validity and application of zoning regulations relating to mobile home or trailer parks, 42 ALR3d 598.

Planned-unit, cluster, or greenbelt zoning, 43 ALR3d 888.

Validity, construction, and application of enactments restricting land development by dredging or filling, 46 ALR3d 1422.

Buffer provision in zoning ordinance as applicable to abutting land in adjoining municipality, 48 ALR3d 1303.

Retroactive effect of effect of zoning regulation, in absence of saving clause, on validly issued building permit, 49 ALR3d 13.

Standing of municipal corporation or other governmental body to attack zoning of land lying outside its borders, 49 ALR3d 1126.

Zoning provisions protecting landowners who applied for or received building permit prior to change in zoning, 49 ALR3d 1150.

Retroactive effect of zoning regulation in absence of saving clause, on pending application for building permit, 50 ALR3d 596.

Validity, construction, and application of zoning ordinance relating to operation of junkyard or scrap metal processing plant, 50 ALR3d 837.

Validity of ordinance zoning the entire municipality for residential use, 54 ALR3d 1282.

Right to resume nonconforming use of premises after involuntary break in the continuity of nonconforming use caused by difficulties unrelated to governmental activity, 56 ALR3d 14.

Right to resume nonconforming use of premises after involuntary break in the continuity of nonconforming use caused by governmental activity, 56 ALR3d 138.

Validity of regulations restricting height of free-standing advertising signs, 56 ALR3d 1207.

Right to resume nonconforming use of premises after voluntary or unexplained break in the continuity of nonconforming use, 57 ALR3d 279.

Right to repair or reconstruct building operating as nonconforming use, after damage or destruction by fire or other casualty, 57 ALR3d 419.

Validity and construction of zoning regulation respecting permissible use as affected by division of lot or parcel by zone boundary line, 58 ALR3d 1241.

Applicability of zoning regulations to waste disposal facilities of state or local governmental entities, 59 ALR3d 1244.

What constitutes “church,” “religious use,” or the like within zoning ordinance, 62 ALR3d 197.

Validity and construction of zoning ordinance requiring developer to devote specified part of development to low and moderate income housing, 62 ALR3d 880.

What constitutes “school,” “educational use,” or the like within zoning ordinance, 64 ALR3d 1087.

Zoning regulations as applied to colleges, universities or similar institutions for higher education, 64 ALR3d 1138.

Standing of owner of property adjacent to zoned property, but not within territory of zoning authority, to attack zoning, 69 ALR3d 805.

Validity, construction, and effect of agreement to rezone, or amendment to zoning ordinance, creating special restrictions or conditions not applicable to other property similarly zoned, 70 ALR3d 125.

What constitutes a “family” within meaning of zoning regulation or restrictive covenant, 71 ALR3d 693.

Zoning or building regulations as applied to condominiums, 71 ALR3d 866.

Adoption of zoning ordinance or amendment thereto through initiative process, 72 ALR3d 991.

Zoning regulations as applied to private and parochial schools below the college level, 74 ALR3d 14.

Zoning regulations as applied to public elementary and high schools, 74 ALR3d 136.

Zoning: regulations creating and placing “floating zones,” 80 ALR3d 95.

Classification and maintenance of advertising structure as nonconforming use, 80 ALR3d 630.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures, 81 ALR3d 486.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway, 81 ALR3d 564.

Application of zoning regulation to radio or television facilities, 81 ALR3d 1086.

Validity of zoning for senior citizen communities, 83 ALR3d 1084.

Zoning regulations as applied to homes or housing for the elderly, 83 ALR3d 1103.

Applicability of zoning regulations to nongovernmental lessee of government-owned property, 84 ALR3d 1187.

Applicability of zoning regulations to projects of nongovernmental public utility as affected by utility's having power of eminent domain, 87 ALR3d 1265.

Validity of municipality's ban on construction until public facilities comply with specific standards, 92 ALR3d 1073.

Validity of ordinance restricting number of unrelated persons who can live together in residential zone, 12 ALR4th 238.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance protecting historical landmarks, 18 ALR4th 990.

Applicability and application of zoning regulations to single residences employed for group living of mentally retarded persons, 32 ALR4th 1018.

Zoning: occupation of less than all dwelling units as discontinuance or abandonment of multifamily dwelling nonconforming use, 40 ALR4th 1012.

Zoning: what constitutes “incidental” or “accessory” use of property zoned, and primarily used, for residential purposes, 54 ALR4th 1034.

Addition of another activity to existing nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 ALR4th 724.

Change in volume, intensity or means of performing nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 ALR4th 806.

Change in type of activity of nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 ALR4th 902.

Zoning: residential off-street parking requirements, 71 ALR4th 529.

Laches as defense in suit by governmental entity to enjoin zoning violation, 73 ALR4th 870.

Construction and application of zoning laws setting minimum lot size requirements, 2 ALR5th 553.

Validity of ordinances restricting location of “adult entertainment” or sex-oriented businesses, 10 ALR5th 538.

Zoning authority as estopped from revoking legally issued building permit, 26 ALR5th 736.

Applicability of zoning regulations to governmental projects or activities, 53 ALR5th 1.

Application of zoning regulations to golf courses, swimming pools, tennis courts, or the like, 63 ALR5th 607.

Determination whether zoning or rezoning of particular parcel constitutes illegal spot zoning, 73 ALR5th 223.

What is “mobile home,” “house trailer,” “trailer house,” or “trailer” within meaning of restrictive covenant, 83 ALR5th 651.

Relief under Federal Civil Rights Act of 1871 (42 U.S.C. § 1983) against denial of building permit or zoning change for privately sponsored low- or moderate-income housing projects on grounds of racial discrimination, 12 ALR Fed 964.

Right of real property owner to relief under Federal Civil Rights Acts against amendment of zoning ordinance increasing minimum lot requirements, 25 ALR Fed 850.

What are “land-use and transportation controls” which may be imposed, under § 100(a)(2)(B) of Clean Air Act of 1970 (42 U.S.C. § 1857c-5 (a)(2)(B) [42 U.S.C. § 7410]), to insure maintenance of national primary ambient air quality standards, 30 ALR Fed 156.

§ 15-1-602.
Regulations; powers of governing body; public hearing; notice.

The governing body shall specify how regulations, restrictions and the district boundaries are to be determined, established, enforced, amended, supplemented or otherwise changed. No governing body shall require that a land use or physical development be consistent with a local land use plan unless the applicable provisions of the local land use plan have been incorporated into the local zoning regulations.

No regulation, restriction or boundary is effective until after a public hearing. At least fifteen (15) days notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 86; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-86; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-704

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2021 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence in (a).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of zoning ordinance or similar public regulation requiring consent of neighboring property owners to permit or sanction specified uses or construction of buildings, 21 ALR2d 551.

Inquiry, upon review of zoning regulation, into motive of members of municipal authority approving or adopting it, 71 ALR2d 568.

Validity of statutory notice requirements prerequisite to adoption on amendment of zoning ordinance, 96 ALR2d 449.

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for giving notice of zoning hearing which must be given a certain number of days before a known future date, 98 ALR2d 1331.

Right to cross-examination of witnesses in hearings before administrative zoning authorities, 27 ALR3d 1304.

§ 15-1-603.
Regulations; protest makes change ineffective; exception; hearing and notice.

If there is a protest against a change in the regulations, restrictions or district boundaries signed by the owners of twenty percent (20%) or more of the area of the lots included in the proposed change, or of those immediately adjacent within a distance of one hundred forty (140) feet, the change is not effective except upon the affirmative vote of three-fourths (3/4) of all the members of the governing body. In determining the one hundred forty (140) feet, the width of any intervening street or alley shall not be included.

The provisions for public hearings and notice specified in W.S.

15-1-602

apply to all changes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 87; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-87; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-705

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Limited review of zoning authority acting in legislative capacity.—

When zoning or rezoning an area within its boundaries, a zoning authority, such as the city council, is acting within its legislative capacity, and its decisions thereon are not reviewable by the district court under the Administrative Procedure Act. McGann v. City Council, 581 P.2d 1104,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of zoning ordinance or similar public regulation requiring consent of neighboring property owners to permit or sanction specified uses or construction of buildings, 21 ALR2d 551.

What zoning regulations are applicable to territory annexed to municipality, 41 ALR2d 1463.

Constitutionality of zoning ordinance authorizing boards, commissions, etc., to vary provisions thereof, 58 ALR2d 1083.

Validity and construction of statutory notice requirements prerequisite to adoption or amendment of zoning ordinance or regulation, 96 ALR2d 449.

Power to terminate lawful nonconforming use existing when zoning ordinance was passed, after use has been permitted to continue, 22 ALR3d 1134.

Adoption of zoning ordinance or amendment thereto as subject of referendum, 72 ALR3d 1030.

§ 15-1-604.
Zoning commission; appointment; duties; effect on governing body.

The mayor, with the consent of the governing body, shall appoint a zoning commission to recommend the boundaries of the various original districts and appropriate regulations to be enforced therein. The commission shall make a preliminary report and hold public hearings before submitting its final report. The governing body shall not hold its public hearings or take action until it has received the commission’s final report. If a city planning commission already exists, it may be appointed as the zoning commission.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 88; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-88; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-706

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 15-1-605.
Board of adjustment; appointment; composition; terms; removal; vacancies.

The mayor, with the consent of the governing body, may appoint a board of adjustment consisting of not less than five (5) nor more than seven (7) members. Each member shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years, except that the initial appointments shall be:

Two (2) for one (1) year;

Two (2) for two (2) years; and

The remaining member or members for three (3) years.

The governing body may remove any board member for cause upon written charges after public hearing. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired portion of a term.

The mayor, with the consent of the governing body, may appoint the city or town planning commission as the board of adjustment.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 89; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-89(a); Laws 1971, ch. 256, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-707(a); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2.

Cited

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. City of Rock Springs, 823 P.2d 1176,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 15-1-606.
Board of adjustment; meetings; procedure; records.

Board meetings shall be held at the call of the chairman and at such other times as the board determines. The chairman, or in his absence the acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses. All board meetings are open to the public. The board shall keep minutes of its proceedings showing the vote of each member upon each question or if the member was absent or failed to vote. The board shall also keep records of its examinations and other official actions. All minutes are public records and shall be filed in the board’s office.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 89; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-89; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-707(b); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-607.
Board of adjustment; appeals to board; grounds; how conducted; stay of proceedings.

Any aggrieved person or any officer, department, board or bureau of the city or town affected by any decision of the administrative officer may appeal to the board. Appeals shall be taken within a reasonable time as provided by the rules of the board by filing with the officer from whom the appeal is taken and with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds therefor. The officer from whom the appeal is taken shall immediately transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken.

An appeal stays all proceedings in furtherance of the action appealed from, unless the officer from whom the appeal is taken certifies to the board that by reason of facts stated in the certificate a stay, in his opinion, would cause imminent peril to life or property. In such cases proceedings shall not be stayed other than by a restraining order granted by the district court for the district, or a judge thereof, on notice to the officer from whom the appeal is taken, and on due cause shown.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 89; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-89; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-707(c), (d); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Writ of mandamus. —

Landowners were precluded from seeking relief from a decision of a city building inspector by way of a petition for writ of mandamus because they had an adequate remedy at law in the form of judicial review of the decision. State ex rel. Baker v. Strange, 960 P.2d 1016,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standing of lot owner to challenge validity or regularity of zoning changes dealing with neighboring property, 37 ALR2d 1143.

Standing of civic or property owners' association to challenge zoning board decision (as aggrieved party), 8 ALR4th 1087.

Circumstances in which indefinite stay of proceedings in federal civil case constitutes abuse of discretion or is otherwise unlawful, 150 ALR Fed 577.

§ 15-1-608.
Board of adjustment; powers and duties; vote required.

The board shall:

Hear and decide:

Appeals from and review any order, requirement, decision or determination made by an administrative official charged with the enforcement of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this article;

All matters referred to it or upon which it is required to pass under any such ordinance.

Fix a reasonable time for hearing an appeal, give public notice, adequate notice to the parties in interest and decide the appeal within a reasonable time. Any party may appear in person at a hearing or by agent or attorney;

Adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this article.

The board has the power to:

Hear and decide special exemptions to the terms of the ordinance upon which the board is required to pass under the ordinance;

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 15, § 2.

Vary or adjust the strict application of any of the requirements of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this article in the case of any physical condition applying to a lot or building if the strict application would deprive the owner of the reasonable use of the land or building involved. No adjustment in the strict application of any provision of an ordinance may be granted unless:

There are special circumstances or conditions, fully described in the board’s findings, which are peculiar to the land or building for which the adjustment is sought and do not apply generally to land or buildings in the neighborhood, and have not resulted from any act of the applicant subsequent to the adoption of the ordinance;

For reasons fully set forth in the board’s findings, the circumstances or conditions are such that the strict application of the provisions of the ordinance would deprive the applicant of the reasonable use of the land or building, the granting of the adjustment is necessary for the reasonable use thereof and the adjustment as granted is the minimum adjustment that will accomplish this purpose; and

The granting of the adjustment is in harmony with the general purposes and intent of the ordinance and will not be injurious to the neighborhood or otherwise detrimental to the public welfare.

Grant exceptions and variances upon request after a showing that an illegal construction or a nonconforming building or use existed for a period of at least five (5) years in violation of local ordinance and the city or town has not taken steps toward enforcement;

Reverse or affirm wholly or partly the order, requirement, decision or determination as necessary, but no power exercised under this paragraph shall exceed the power or authority vested in the administrative officer from whom the appeal is taken.

The concurring vote of a majority of the board is necessary to reverse any order, requirement, decision or determination of any administrative official, or to decide in favor of the application on any matter upon which it is required to pass under any ordinance or to effect any variation in the ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 89; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-89(g); 1971, ch. 256, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-707(e), (f), (g); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 209, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (b)(i)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Zoning board order denying challenger's petition for rehearing was not appealable final order

since the board lacked authority to rehear its original decision, which granted a use permit. Further, the filing of the petition for rehearing did not toll the running of the time period for filing a notice of appeal of final agency action under Rule 12.04, W.R.A.P. Rosenberger v. City of Casper Bd. of Adjustment, 765 P.2d 367,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1988).

Minimum adjustment necessary to accomplish purpose of variance.—

Board of adjustment's findings of fact did not provide a reasonable basis for board's conclusion that variance granted for fence construction was the minimal adjustment necessary to accomplish its purpose, which was to allow owners to obtain liability insurance. Ebzery v. City of Sheridan, 982 P.2d 1251,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1999), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. July 20, 1999).

Findings of fact and conclusions of law required. —

Where the Board of Adjustment failed to provide findings of fact and conclusions of law with its decision pursuant to subsection (b)(ii) of this section, its decision to grant the variance was not in accordance with the law of § 16-3-114(c)(ii)(A). Juroszek v. City of Sheridan Bd. of Adjustment, 948 P.2d 1370,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Cook v. Zoning Bd. of Adjustment, 776 P.2d 181,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Judgment denying permit for use of premises under zoning regulations as bar to subsequent application, 71 ALR2d 1362.

Who may apply for variance, special exception, or use permit, 89 ALR2d 663.

Imposing restriction as to hours or days of operation of business as condition of allowance of special zoning exception or variance, 99 ALR2d 227.

Disqualification for bias or interest of administrative officer sitting in zoning proceeding, 10 ALR3d 694.

Construction and application of statute or ordinance requiring notice as prerequisite to granting variance or exception to zoning requirement, 38 ALR3d 167.

Authority of zoning commission to impose, as condition of allowance of special zoning exception, permit, or variance, requirements as to highway and traffic changes, 49 ALR3d 492.

Zoning board's grant of new application for zoning change, variance, or special exception after denial of previous application covering same property or part thereof, 52 ALR3d 494.

§ 15-1-609.
Board of adjustment; review of decisions.

The decision of the board may be reviewed by the district court pursuant to Rule 12 of the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 89; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-89; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-707(h), (j), (k), (m); Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2003 WY 40, 65 P.3d 720,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Intervention in court review of zoning proceeding, right as to, 46 ALR2d 1059.

§ 15-1-610.
Action to prevent violations authorized.

If any building or structure is erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, repaired, converted or maintained, or if any building, structure or land is used in violation of this article or of any ordinance or other regulation made under its authority, the proper authorities of the city or town, in addition to other remedies prescribed by ordinance, may institute any appropriate action to prevent:

The violation;

The occupancy of the building, structure or land; or

Any illegal act, conduct, business or use in or about the premises.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 90; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-90; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-708

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Violation of zoning ordinance or regulation as affecting or creating liability for injuries or death, 31 ALR2d 1469.

Remedies to compel municipal officials to enforce zoning regulations, 35 ALR2d 1135.

Mandamus to compel zoning officials to cancel permit granted in violation of zoning regulation, 68 ALR3d 166.

Change in area or location of nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 56 ALR4th 769.

Alteration, extension, reconstruction or repair of nonconforming structure or structure devoted to nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 63 ALR4th 275.

§ 15-1-611.
Higher standards govern in conflicts.

If the regulations made under this article conflict with any statutes or local ordinances or other regulations, the statutes, ordinances or regulations imposing the higher standards govern.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 91; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-91; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-709

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Change in ownership of nonconforming business or use as affecting right to continuance thereof, 9 ALR2d 1039.

Zoning regulation of intoxicating liquor as pre-empted by state law, 65 ALR4th 555.